Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1360
Affirmative Action Administrator;
duties; enumerated.

The administrator shall be the head of
the office. The administrator shall be given all necessary top management
support to insure that there is compliance with Nebraska's program and shall
be provided with sufficient staff and budget support to carry out the duties
of the office. The administrator shall:

(1) Have the authority and responsibility for coordinating, directing,
and implementing the program;

(2) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation
of the agencies' plans;

(3) Provide counseling and technical assistance to the agencies in the
development of their plans;

(4) Review agency plans and direct modification to insure the effectiveness
of the plans and their compliance with the program;

(5) Monitor the progress of agency plans by establishing reporting forms
as required by the program;

(6) Review the quarterly reports of the agencies;

(7) Monitor the progress of the program and report quarterly to the
Governor;

(8) Make formal recommendations for legislation, when necessary, in
order to make changes in the program;

(9) Serve as liaison between the state and federal compliance agencies;

(10) Plan, coordinate, and conduct training in equal employment opportunity,
racial awareness, and concerns of women, the disabled, and aging for all segments
of the state government work force;

(11) Coordinate the activities of the agency affirmative action individual
in each agency;

(12) Investigate any complaints involving unfair treatment, terms and
conditions of employment, or perceived acts or policies involving discrimination;

(13) Conduct contract compliance reviews on all vendors, grantees, and
contractors who have programs or projects which are funded in whole or in
part by state funds;

(14) Coordinate the Disadvantage Business Enterprise and Women Business
Enterprise programs which are funded in whole or in part by state or federal
funds; and

(15) Submit an annual report to the Governor and Legislature. The report submitted to the Legislature
shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 1979, LB 500, § 6;

Laws 1987, LB 491, § 20;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 198.
July 19, 2012